src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
"G1:g"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Г1:г <=> [CnsVoicedDent (:ь|%{ЬØ%}:0)| й | [ CnsVoicedNonDent - г ] ( :ь )] (HarmDummies:) %>  (%-) _ а ;

"G1:k"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Г1:к <=>  [ CnsVoicelessDent ( :ь | %{ЬØ%}:0 | %{ЬØ%}:ь ) | CnsVoicelessNonDent | г | %{КТ%}: %{ЬØ%}: | К4:0 ] (HarmDummies:)  %> (%-) _ а  ;
          

!Prolative
"G2:g"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Г2:г <=> [ CnsVoicedDent ( :ь )| [ CnsVoicedNonDent - г ] ( :ь ) ] (HarmDummies:)  %> _ а: ;

"G2:v"! 
Г2:в <=> [ :Vows (:0) %> | :Vows ] _ а: [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- |%> [ (%-) Г1:0 |  %{оеэØ%}:  SIVV |т | н | м | с | д: |%{дт%}: | в | к с | л | %{АЯ%}: ] ];


"G2:k"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Г2:к <=>  [ CnsVoicelessDent ( :ь )| CnsVoicelessNonDent ( :ь )| г ] (HarmDummies:)  %> _ а: [ (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- |%> [ (%-) Г1:0 | %{оеэØ%}: SIVV | т | н | с | д: |%{дт%}:| в | к с | л ] ] ;
           Vows CnsVoiceless  (HarmDummies:) %> VLoss:0 _ а: ;

! 2012-08-07
"G4:g" !Imperative Clitics
Г4:г  <=> з ь %> _ а ;


"G4:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Г4:0  <=>
           [ %{КТ%}: %{ЬØ%}: | к ] %> _ а: ;
!           [ %{КТ%}: %{ЬØ%}: | к ] %> _ а ; 2024-12-23
  [О1:е|О1:о|и|ы] %> _ а: ;
!! саемс+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Clt/Ga:
!!€ сай>{КТ}{ЬØ}>Г4а
!!€ сай>т0>0я

"G4:k"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Г4:к  <=>  # [и л я|у ж о|а з ё|а д я|а й д а] %> _ а  ;

!"%^Д1:"
!мондак,кельдяк,келесяк
!

"m:0" 
м:0 <=>
  т (ь) _ (HarmDummies:) %> с [(%^OldAE:0) #|%-|(т) %{оэØ%}:] ;
!! потмо+N+Relator+SP+Ela+Indef: **inside/sisäosa**
!!€ потм%{back%}%>ст%{оэØ%}
!!€ пот00%>сто
! BTV  _ У2:0  %>  VLoss: [ т | т н е:э ] ;
!        т (ь) _ [ У2: ]  %>  VLoss: [с (т) [О1:э|О1:о|О1:0]|с [  (%^OldAE:0) # | %-| %> [(%-) Г1:0|(%-) Г1:к]]] ;



!! imperative suffix
"K1:t"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{КТ%}:т <=>   Cns ( ь: ) (%{back%}:|%{backHard%}:|%{frontSoft%}:|%{frontHard%}:) %> _ %{ЬØ%}: [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %> ] ;

!! лыказевемс+V+Imprt+ScSg2: **have taken**
!!€ лыказев%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ лыказев%>ть
   Cns ( ь: ) (%{back%}:|%{backHard%}:|%{frontSoft%}:|%{frontHard%}:) %> _ %{АЯ%}:  ;

"K1:к"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{КТ%}:к <=> Vows (%{back%}:|%{backHard%}:|%{frontSoft%}:|%{frontHard%}:) %> _ %{ЬØ%}: [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- ]  ;
 Vows (%{back%}:|%{backHard%}:|%{frontSoft%}:|%{frontHard%}:) %> _ %{АЯ%}:  ;
!! ливтемс+V+Prec+ScSg2: **set out/laittaa esille**
!!€ ливть%>%{КТ%}%{АЯ%}
!!€ ливт0%>тя
!THIS needs a separate rule 2020-03-25


! Suffix final hard vs soft
"U4:y"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{ЬØ%}:ь <=>
 [ FTC |:FTV [ %> | :0 | AC ]* CnsNonDent | л ь: ] ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %>  %{КТ%}:т  _  [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %>  (%-) Г1: ] ;
[ LFCS | :FTV | ь: ]  ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %>  т  _  [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %>  (%-) Г1: ] ;
[ LFCS | :FTV |:BTV | ь: ]  ( HarmDummies: ) (%> %^NoLinkVow:) %> %{dialM%}: [т| с]  _  [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %>  (%-) Г1: ] ;
!! кал+N+Sg+Nom+Def: **fish/kala**
!!€ кал>{dialM}с{ЬØ}
!!€ кал>0с0
  [  :FTV ( %{frontSoft%}: )  %>  %{оеэØ%}:0 | %>  [ %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э ]] [ н | ( н | в ) т ]  _  [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %>  (%-) Г1: ] ;

!#  [ [ [ LFCS   %> | :FTV  %> ( %{оеэØ%}:0 ) | ь:  %> ] | %{оеэØ%}:е | %{оеэØ%}:э | О1:е | О1:э ] [ н | ( н | в ) т ] |  [ LFCS | ь: | :FTV ] %> %{КТ%}:т ]  _  [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %>  (%-) Г1: ] ;
!! пильге+N+Pl+Nom+Indef **leg; foot/jalka**
!!€ пильг%{frontSoft%}%>т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пильг0%>ть
!! валдо+N+Pl+Nom+Indef **light/valo**
!!$ валд%{backHard%}%>т%{ЬØ%}
!!$ валд0%>ть
!! лыказевемс+V+Imprt+ScSg2: **have taken**
!!€ лыказев%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ лыказев%>ть

"U4:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{ЬØ%}:0 <=>
 [ LFCH (%{frontHard%}:) | :FTV (HarmDummies:) | LBCCns  (%{backHard%}:|%{back%}:) | :BTV (%{back%}:) ] %> %{КТ%}:  _  [ (%^OldAE:0) #  | %- | %>  (%-) Г1: ] ;
 [ LFCH (%{frontHard%}:) | %^H:0 | LBCCns (%{backHard%}:|%{back%}:) | :BTV (%{back%}:) ] %> т  _  [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %>  (%-) Г1: ] ;
 [ LFCH (%{frontHard%}:) | LBCCns (%{backHard%}:|%{back%}: ) ] (%> %^NoLinkVow:) %> %{dialM%}: [т| с]  _  [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %>  (%-) Г1: ] ;
   [ LFCS | :FTV | ь: ]  ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %> %{оеэØ%}: в т  _  %>  %{оеэØ%}: ;
   [ LFCS | й | ь: ] %> %{КТ%}: _ %> [Г4: а: ] ;

#  [  LFCH | :BTV ] (%{frontHard%}: | %{back%}: | %{backHard%}: ) %> [ %{оеэØ%}:0 | %{оеэØ%}:о ] [ н | ( н | в ) т ] _  [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %>  (%-) Г1: ] ;

 LBC (%{backHard%}: | %{back%}: ) %> [ %{оеэØ%}:0 |%{оеэØ%}:о ] [ н | ( н | в ) т ]  _  [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %>  (%-) Г1: ] ;
 
!! вадемс+V+Der/Ovt+Prc/Telic+Sg+Nom+Def: **the greased one/**
!!€ вадь>{оеэØ}вт{ЬØ}>{оеэØ}сь
!!€ вад0>евт0>есь

!! валдо+N+Pl+Nom+Indef **light/valo**
!!€ валд%{backHard%}%>т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ валд0%>т0

"t:d"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 т:д <=> CnsVoiced (ь:) (HarmDummies:) (%>) %^TD:0 %> _ ;
!! ловомс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2: **regard/pitää jonain**
!!€ лов>^TD>т{АЯ}н
!!€ лов>0>дан

!!!TLoss sloppy
!"t:0"
!т:0 <=> [ [ т | %{КТ%}:т ] ( %{ЬØ%}: ) %> TLoss:0 | т У2:0 %> VLoss:0 TLoss:0 ] ( %> ) _ ;

!!SLoss s s > s = s 0 0 s
"s:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
с:0 <=> с _ %>  с ;
! с _ %> SLoss:0 с ;

!!€ класс%>с
!!€ клас0%>с


!Ablative d/t
"d:t"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{дт%}:т  <=> [ CnsVoiceless | д | г] (ь:0) (HarmDummies:)  %> _ [О1:е|О1:э|О1:о] ;
!!€ кедь%>%{дт%}О1
!!€ кед0%>те
!!€ обед%{frontHard%}%>%{дт%}О1
!!€ обед0%>тэ
!!$ обед%{frontHard%}%>%{дт%}О1
!!$ обед0%>дэ
!         т [ И2:0 ] %> VLoss:0 _ [О1:е|О1:э|О1:о] ;
!Word final Vowels

"d:d"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{дт%}:д  <=> [ CnsVoiced - [ д | г]| :Vows] (ь:) (HarmDummies:)  %> _ [О1:е|О1:э|О1:о] ;

"y:y"
!! **@RULENAME@**
ь:ь <=> Cns _ [Cns|Vows |(HarmDummies:) (%^OldAE:0) # |(HarmDummies:)  %- |(HarmDummies:)  %> [с (т) [ы|а|о|%{оэØ%}:] |с [(%^OldAE:0) #|%-|%> (%-) Г1:]|(%^NoLinkVow:0) :CnsNonDent ]] ;
   [д|Д|л|Л|н|Н|р|Р] _ (HarmDummies:) %> %^NoLinkVow: %> з %{оэØ%}: ;
   [л|Л] _ (HarmDummies:) %> (:0) [ :Cns] ;
    Cns _ (HarmDummies:) %^SoftRetain: %> [т н е | т е м] ;
!!€ ведь{frontSoft}^SoftRetain>тне
!!€ ведь00>тне
!Й:Й Ц:Ц _ >:> %{КТ%}:к %{ЬØ%}:ь

"y:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
ь:0 <=> Cns _ %^Ь2ZERO: ;
!!кель+N+Sg+Gen+Def: __language__
!!€ кель^Ь2ZERO>енть
!!€ кел00>енть
     CnsDent  _ (%{frontSoft%}:)  %> [ %{АЯ%}:я | %{иы%}: | %{оеэØ%}:е | О1:е | %{уиыØ%}:и | е %> ] ;
     CnsDentNoL _ ( %{frontSoft%}: ) %> [в:0 т %{оеэ%}:е м [О1:е|О1:0] | %{КТ%}:т %{ЬØ%}: | Н1:н | н | д: |%{дт%}:| ц е: [ (%^OldAE:0) # | %- | %> ] |( %>) т |(%^NoLinkVow:) с (т) [ ь: | е: ]] ;
     CnsDentNoL _ ( %{frontSoft%}: ) (%^TD:)  %> т: ;
   Vows н: _ (HarmDummies:) %^CnsRM: ;
!! ломань+N+Pl+Indef: **person/ihminen**
!!€ ломаньCnsRM>ть
!!€ лома000>ть

!! меремс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: **say/sanoa**
!!€ мерь>сь
!!€ мер0>сь
!!$ мерь>сь
!!$ мерь>сь
!! лисемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: **go out/mennä ulos**
!!€ лись>сь
!!€ лис0>сь
!!$ лись>сь
!!$ лись>сь

!"y loss with plural"
!!! **@RULENAME@**
!ь:0 <=> Vows _ (ь:) (HarmDummies:) %^CnsRM: ;
!!! ведун+N+Pl+Indef: **knower/tietäjä**
!!!€ ведунCnsRM
!!!€ веду00



!"U2:0"
!У2:0 <=>  _ %> VLoss:0 [ ( TLoss:0 ) т [ %{ЬØ%}:0 | %{ЬØ%}:ь | %{АЯ%}:а ] | ( TLoss:0 ) т н е: |с (т) [О1:о|О1:0]| с [ %> | (%^OldAE:0) # | %- ] ] ;
!          _ %> VLoss:0 [д:|%{дт%}:] [ О1:о ] ;

!"U2:o"
!У2:о  <=>  _ [ %> [ (н) т %{ЬØ%}:0 | н %{ЬØ%}:0 | т н е: | с ь: | с (т) [ О1:о | О1:0 ] | с [ %> |  (%^OldAE:0) # |  %- ] | з %> %{оеэØ%}: | л  |  (н) з [ О1:о | О1:0 ] | ш к а | к с | н | в | Г2:в | д | с т [ %> |  (%^OldAE:0) # | %- ] ] | (%-) Г1:0|  (%^OldAE:0) # | %- ] ;


!Disallow

"Disallow TLoss after non-t"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
TLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :т ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow ^H before t and subsequent {ЬØ}"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^H:0 /<= [ :Vows (%{back%}: | %{backHard%}: |%{frontHard%}: | %{frontSoft%}: ) | CnsDent | щ | Щ | й | Й | ь: | Ь: ]  _ %> т [ %{ЬØ%}: | н Е3: ] ;
                          [:Vows| й | Й | ь: | Ь: ] (CnsNonDentShib) CnsNonDentShib  _ %> т [ %{ЬØ%}: | н Е3: ] ;
             :Vows [м б|й к |к к|п к|м м|й п| м п|й ф]   _ %> т [ %{ЬØ%}: | н Е3: ]  ;
 BTV [CnsNonDent - [ щ | Щ]]  _ %> т [ %{ЬØ%}: | н Е3: ] ;
 BTV [л г|л к|л х|н г|н к|н х|р г|р к|р х|с к]  _ %> т %{ЬØ%}: ;
 BTV [л ф|л м|л б|л п]  _ %> т %{ЬØ%}: ;
 BTV [р ф|р м|р в|р б|р п|с п|ш к|з м|н в ]  _ %> т %{ЬØ%}: ;
 BTV [ч | ш | ж]  _ %> т %{ЬØ%}: ;
 BTV [н ч|л ч|р ч|в ш|к ш |р ш| р ж| ч | ш | ж]  _ %> т %{ЬØ%}: ;
     [Letters - CnsHardNonDent ] _ %> н е: н ь ;
![аоуяёю](нч|лч|рч|ч|вш|кш|рш|ш|рж|ж)
!(нг|нк|рб|рг|рк|лп|лк|ск|рм|рх|рф|лф|сп|шк|зм|рм|лм|нх|рв|лб|нв|лг|рп|лх|[нлрс]ч|[нлрс]ш|[нлрс]ж)
![еи]лькш
! [к ш|м ш|п ш]
! бвгкмпфх
"Disallow RegrRaise after A"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^RegrRaise:0 /<= .#. [а:|я:] _ %> [ с а | т %{АЯ%}: ] ;

"Disallow vow loss before break"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^Break:0 /<= [Cns:| ь:| %{ЬØ%}:] (HarmDummies:) _ %> %{АЯ%}: ;

"Disallow OldAE when no Ä"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^OldAE:0 /<= .#. NoAE* _ .#. ;

"Disallow {уиыØ} after vowel"
%{уиыØ%}: /<= [:Vows|Vows:] %> _ ;
!!$ раське>{уиыØ}нь
!!$ раське>0нь

"Disallow KLoss after non-k"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
KLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :к ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow SLoss after non-s"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
SLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :с ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow %^WLoss after non-v"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%^WLoss:0 /<= [ [ Letters ] - [ в ] ] %> _ %> %{оеэØ%}: в: ;
!%^WLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* [ в л | в О1: л ] ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow Н1:н after Letters"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Н1:н /<= Letters _ ;

!"Disallow з where not following voiced consonant or vowel"
!!! **@RULENAME@**
! з:з /<=
! !\[ CnsVoiced ] (ь:) (HarmDummies:) %> _ %> %{оеэØ%}:  ;
!      \[:Vows]  (HarmDummies:) %> _ %> %{оеэØ%}:  ;
!! \[л | р | н |:Vows (HarmDummies:)] (ь:) %> _ %> %{оеэØ%}:  ;

!!€ пильге{frontSoft}>з>{оеэØ}нз{оэØ}
!!€ пильге0>з>энзэ


"Disallow soft loss"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 т:т /<= [ л ь: | ь:0 | Vows:|:Vows|Cns:| ъ: ] (HarmDummies:) %^SoftRetain: %> _ [ н е | е м ] ;
!+Err/Orth-stem-soft-should-be-0:%^SoftRetain%>тне
!!€ кирьпець^SoftRetain>тне
!!€ кирьпець0>тне


"Disallow hard dent with soft error"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %^HardNoDent:0 /<=  CnsDent  (HarmDummies:) _ %> т н  ;
     [[Cns|Vows:|:Vows| ь: | й:] - HardBackNoDentShib ]  (HarmDummies:) _ %> т н  ;
!+Err/Orth-stem-nodent-hard-should-be-tnje:%^HardNoDent%>тнэ

"Disallow SoftRetain"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^SoftRetain:0 /<= [ ь:0 | й: | Vows:|:Vows|Cns:| ъ: ] (HarmDummies:)  _ %> т [ н е | е м ] ;

!!OLD

!"Disallow %{ОØ%} where not T, sO, stO, s"
!! **@RULENAME@**
! %{ОØ%}:0 /<= _ %> \[ т %{ЬØ%}: | т н Е3: | с ( т ) %{оэØ%}: | с [ %> | .#. ] ] ;
!! чувто+N+Pl+Nom+Def: **tree/puu**
!!€ чувт%{ОØ%}%>тнЕ3
!!€ чувт0%>тнэ

!"Disallow %{ЕØ%}:0 where not T, sO, stO, s"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! %{ЕØ%}:0 /<= _ %> \[ т %{ЬØ%}: | т н Е3: | с ( т ) %{оэØ%}: | с [ %> | .#. ] ] ;

!"Disallow %{ОØ%}:ь where not T, sO, stO, s"
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! %{ЕØ%}:ь /<= _ %> \[ т %{ЬØ%}: | с ( т ) %{оэØ%}: | с [ %> | .#. ] ] ;

!! веле+N+SP+Tra+PxSg2
!!€ веле%>%{оеэØ%}кс%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ веле%>0кс%>эть

!! псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScPl3+Clt/Gak
!!€ псака%>втО1мО1%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%}%>%{оеэØ%}линек%>Г1ак
!!€ псака%>втомо%>0т0%>олинек%>как
!! ош+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2
!!€ ош%>%{оеэØ%}з%>%{оеэØ%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ ош%>оз%>от0
!       	     :BTV в %^WLoss:0  %> _ в: ( О1: ) л ;
!!€ эряв%>^WLoss%>{ОЕЭØ}вО1ль
!!€ эряв%>0%>00оль

!! псака+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Der+Der/MWN+N+SP+Tra+Indef: **cat/kissa**
!!€ псака%>вт%{оеэ%}мО1%>%{оеэØ%}нз%{оэØ%}%>кс
!!€ псака%>втомо%>0нзо%>кс

!! веле+N+SP+Tra+PxSg2+Clt/Cop+Prt2+ScPl3: **village/kylä**
!!€ веле>{оеэØ}кс>{оеэØ}т{ЬØ}>{оеэØ}льть
!!€ веле>0кс>эт0>ельть

"Disallow %^NoLinkVow after vowel"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^NoLinkVow:0 /<= :Vows  (HarmDummies:) %> _ ;
           [:Vows | CnsVoiceless (ь) ]  (HarmDummies:) %> _ з ;

"Disallow s for control of stems with inessive..."
!! **@RULENAME@**
с:с /<= [т|д|к|г|п|б|м|н|л|р|в|й:|ф|х] (ь:) (HarmDummies:) %> %{оеэØ%}: _ [(%^OldAE:0) #|%-|(т) %{оэØ%}:] ;

"Disallow dano after non-voiced"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %^TD:0 /<= [CnsVoiceless (ь:)| :Vows | Vows: ] (HarmDummies:) (%>) _ (%^RegrRaise:) %> т: %{АЯ%}: ;
           %{оеэØ%}: (К3:) _ %> т: %{АЯ%}: ;
!%>%{оеэØ%}К3

!к е к ш н е ^TD:0 > т {АЯ}:я н о
!CnsVoiced (ь:) (HarmDummies:) (%>) %^TD:0 %> _
